Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2639.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5603(d) and (e)(3) of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 5603. Administration.* * *(d) Review process.--The commission shall review applications and make awards subject to subsection (e) on a rolling basis. No later than 90 days after a completed application is received from an eligible applicant, the commission, in consultation with the Governor's Office of Homeland Security and the Pennsylvania State Police, shall review and approve or deny the application. An eligible applicant's exemption from providing non-State financial participation, as provided for in subsection (e)(3), may not be 123456789101112131415161718 a determining factor in approval or denial of the application. An eligible applicant may revise and resubmit a denied application to the commission.(e) Allocation.--An eligible applicant may not receive more than the following amounts in any fiscal year:* * *(3) The commission may award a grant between $25,001 and $75,000 if the eligible applicant provides non-State financial participation equal to 33% of the requested grant amount. An eligible applicant may not be required to provide any amount of non-State financial participation if the eligible applicant had annual gross revenue of less than $250,000 during the prior calendar year.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2639PN3608 - 2 - 123456789101112131415